Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.157

When commodity commission is terminated—Duties of affected commodity commission.

If after complying with the procedures outlined in this chapter and a referendum proposal to terminate a commodity commission is assented to, the affected commodity commission shall:

(1) Document the details of all measures undertaken to terminate the commodity commission and identify and document all closing costs;

(2) Contact the office of the state auditor and arrange for a final audit of the commission. Payment for the audit shall be from commission funds and identified in the budget for closing costs;

(3) Provide for the reimbursement to affected producers of moneys collected by assessment. Reimbursement shall be made to those considered affected producers over the previous three-year time frame on a pro rata basis and at a percent commensurate with their volume of production over the previous three-year period unless a different time period is specified in the marketing order. If the commodity commission finds that the amounts of moneys are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund, the moneys shall be paid into the state treasury as unclaimed trust moneys; and

(4) Transfer all remaining files to the department for storage and archiving, as appropriate.

[ 2002 c 313 s 60.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.